Tennessee, session 114, HB0732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 60, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department of education shall develop or approve a policy developed by an
LEA or public charter school allowing for the retake of a Tennessee comprehensive
assessment program (TCAP) test, including an end-of-course assessment, if the
administration of one (1) or more of the state-mandated TCAP tests is interrupted due to
an act of God or another circumstance beyond the control of the school.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
HB0732
002303
- 1 -